Idaho, session 2025, H0464.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for the
Student Services Program the following amounts to be expended according to
the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $39,100 $267,300 $1,500 $307,900
Public Charter School Authorizers
Fund $300,000 300,000
School Bus Camera
Fund 6,800 6,800
American Rescue Plan
Fund 89,900 174,100 264,000
Federal Grant
Fund 136,700 1,429,500 4,500 0 1,570,700
TOTAL $265,700 $1,870,900 $6,000 $306,800 $2,449,400


SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the State Department of Education is hereby increased by one (1.00) for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. DATA SHARING. The State Department of Education and the Of-
fice of the State Board of Education shall partner to provide a monthly data
file to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services
Office using data stored in the Idaho System for Educational Excellence.
Each data file shall be provided no later than the 10th day of each month in
an electronic spreadsheet format that allows for analysis, formulas, and
report building. The final format and content of the data file shall be de-
termined by Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services
Office. Data that could identify a student's special status and that is pro-
tected for privacy concerns should be omitted, and an alternative data point
should be provided when possible.
SECTION 4. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Anal-
ysis Division of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes
related to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to
standard federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost
allocation plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency
support staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.
SECTION 5. UNDERPERFORMING CHARTER SCHOOLS. The State Department of
Education shall provide a report to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office on the performance status of each charter
school that received financial support for being considered as underper-
forming. The report shall be submitted no later than January 5, 2026.
SECTION 6. BUILDING CAPACITY PROJECT. The State Department of Educa-
tion shall provide a report to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office on the performance status of each school partic-
ipating in the building capacity project. The report shall be submitted no
later than January 5, 2026.
SECTION 7. That Section 30 of House Bill No. 251, as enacted by the
First Regular Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the


same is hereby amended to read as follows:
SECTION 30. ACQUISITIONS. Consistent with the provisions
of Chapter 92, Title 67, Idaho Code, and funding provided in
Section 5 of this act, the State Department of Education is
encouraged required to engage in open, competitive acquisition
processes. The State Department of Education shall provide a re-
port to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 1,
2025, on all contracts signed during fiscal year 2025 for property
valued at more than $25,000. The report shall include for each
contract: (a) the amount; (b) the duration; (c) the parties; (d)
the subject; (e) whether the contract was awarded as a result of an
open, competitive acquisition process or as a sole source or other
noncompetitive procurement pursuant to Section 67-9221, Idaho
Code; and (f) the rationale for signing any sole source or other
noncompetitive procurements.
SECTION 8. That Section 15 of House Bill No. 341, as enacted by the
First Regular Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the
same is hereby amended to read as follows:
SECTION 15. ACQUISITIONS. Consistent with the provisions of
Chapter 92, Title 67, Idaho Code, the State Department of Education
is encouraged required to engage in open, competitive acquisition
processes. The State Department of Education shall provide a re-
port to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 1,
2025, on all contracts signed during fiscal year 2025 for property
valued at more than $25,000. The report shall include for each
contract: (a) the amount; (b) the duration; (c) the parties; (d)
the subject; (e) whether the contract was awarded as a result of an
open, competitive acquisition process or as a sole source or other
noncompetitive procurement pursuant to Section 67-9221, Idaho
Code; and (f) the rationale for signing any sole source or other
noncompetitive procurements.
SECTION 9. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 10. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the State Department of Education any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated to the State Department of Education in the Administra-
tion Program from the General Fund for the purpose of an office remodel for
fiscal year 2025, in an amount not to exceed $800,000 from the General Fund to
be used for nonrecurring expenditures related to the office remodel for the
period July 1, 2025 through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller
shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense classes, and pro-
gram, with the Legislative Service Office prior to processing the reappro-
priation authorized herein.


SECTION 11. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 291, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for the Student
Services Program $33,600 from the School Bus Camera Fund to be expended for
trustee and benefit payments for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025.
SECTION 12. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 11 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 10 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.